District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.04

Medication administration training program.

(a)

By July 1, 2008, the Mayor shall develop and implement a medication administration training program, which shall provide training and certification of employees and agents of a school to:

(1)

Administer medication to students with valid medication action plans who are not authorized to possess that medication or are not competent to self-administer the medication; and

(2)

Administer medication in emergency circumstances to any student experiencing an acute episode of asthma, anaphylaxis, or other illness.

(b)

All training provided pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be conducted by a health-care professional licensed in the District of Columbia.

(c)

A health-care professional shall provide a school with written certification of successful completion of the training for each employee or agent of the school. The certification shall be valid for 3 years.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 5, 54 DCR 12230
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 24, 59 DCR 5567

History

This section is referenced in § 38-651.05 and § 38-651.06.

Section References

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “experiencing” for “suffering” in (a)(2).

Effect of Amendments

Delegation of Authority to the Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2008-85, June 11, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9362).

Delegation of Authority

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Editor's Notes